Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF4141.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 609.2231, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 12. new text end new text begin Housing and redevelopment authority employees. new text end new text begin (a) A person is guilty of a gross misdemeanor who: new text end new text begin (1) assaults an employee or agent of a housing and redevelopment authority established under chapter 469, or of an entity exercising the powers of a housing and redevelopment authority under that chapter; and new text end new text begin (2) does so while the victim is engaged in the performance of official duties or because of the victim's employment or affiliation with the authority or entity. new text end new text begin (b) Whoever commits assault under paragraph (a) and inflicts demonstrable bodily harm is guilty of a felony and may be sentenced to imprisonment for not more than two years or to payment of a fine of not more than $4,000, or both. new text end new text begin (c) For purposes of this subdivision, "employee or agent" means an individual who is employed by, under contract with, or otherwise acting on behalf of a housing and redevelopment authority or an entity exercising housing and redevelopment authority powers. Employee or agent includes individuals acting in either a paid or volunteer capacity. Employee or agent includes but is not limited to individuals engaged in property management, inspections, tenant services, housing programs, compliance, subsidy administration, legal representation, executive management, or policy and advisory roles. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective August 1, 2026, and applies to crimes committed on or after that date. new text end